src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/noun-kin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Normal even syllable nouns on kin terms. Separate test file since they take the full Px paradigm (this is now regulated by flag diacritics and not through separate lexicas. 

Tests:
  Noun - oabbá: # MUORRA
    oabbá+N+Sg+Nom: oabbá
    oabbá+N+Sg+Acc: oappáv
    oabbá+N+Sg+Ill: oabbáj
    oabbá+N+Sg+Ela: oappás
    oabbá+N+Pl+Nom: oappá
    oabbá+N+Pl+Acc: oappájt
    oabbá+N+Pl+Ill: oappájda
    oabbá+N+Pl+Ela: oappájs
    oabbá+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: oabbám
    oabbá+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: oabbát
    oabbá+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: oabbás
    oabbá+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: oappánis
    oabbá+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: oappáma
    oabbá+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu2: oappástihtte
    oabbá+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu3: oappániska
    oabbá+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [oappájam, oappájim]
    oabbá+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: oappájihtte
    oabbá+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: oappájdiseda
    oabbá+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: oappájdisá
    oabbá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oappásj

  Noun - áhkko: # MUORRA 
    áhkko+N+Sg+Nom: áhkko
    áhkko+N+Sg+Acc: áhkov
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ill: áhkkuj
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ela: áhkos
    áhkko+N+Pl+Nom: áhko
    áhkko+N+Pl+Acc: áhkojt
    áhkko+N+Pl+Ill: áhkojda
    áhkko+N+Pl+Ela: áhkojs
    áhkko+N+Pl+Ine: áhkojn
    áhkko+N+Pl+Com: áhkoj
    áhkko+N+Pl+Ill: áhkojda
    áhkko+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: áhkkum
    áhkko+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: áhkkut
    áhkko+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: áhkkos
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: áhkonis
    áhkko+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: áhkuma
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu2: áhkostihtte
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu3: áhkoniska
    áhkko+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [áhkojam, áhkojim]
    áhkko+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: áhkojihtte    
    áhkko+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: áhkojdiseda
    áhkko+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: áhkojdisá
    áhkko+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: áhkusj
  
  Noun - ieddne: # MUORRA 
    ieddne+N+Sg+Nom: ieddne
    ieddne+N+Sg+Gen: iedne
    ieddne+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [ædnáma, ädnáma]
    ieddne+N+Sg+Acc: iednev
    ieddne+N+Sg+Ine: iednen
    ieddne+N+Sg+Ill: [æddnáj, äddnáj]
    ieddne+N+Sg+Ela: iednes
    ieddne+N+Sg+Com: iednijn
    ieddne+N+Pl+Nom: iedne
    ieddne+N+Pl+Gen: iednij
    ieddne+N+Pl+Acc: iednijt
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ine: iednijn
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ill: iednijda
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: iednijdiseda
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ela: iednijs
    ieddne+N+Pl+Com: iednij
    ieddne+N+Ess: ieddnen
    ieddne+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [ædnásj, ädnásj]
    ieddne+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [ædnátjasj, ädnátjasj]
    ieddne+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: iednedibme
    ieddne+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ieddne+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [ædnálasj, ädnálasj]
    ieddne+N+Abe: [iednedak, iedneda] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
    ieddne+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [æddnám, äddnám]
    ieddne+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ieddnes
    ieddne+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: [æddnásimme, äddnásimme]
    ieddne+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [iednijat, iednijit]
    ieddne+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: iednijimme
    
  Noun - viellja: # MUORRA 
    viellja+N+Sg+Nom: viellja
    viellja+N+Sg+Ine: vieljan
    viellja+N+Sg+Ill: vielljaj
    viellja+N+Pl+Ine: vieljajn
    viellja+N+Pl+Com: vieljaj
    viellja+N+Pl+Ill: vieljajda
    viellja+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vieljasj
    viellja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: vielljas
    viellja+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: vielljasimme
    
  Noun - guojmme: # MUORRA
    guojmme+N+Sg+Nom: guojmme
    guojmme+N+Sg+Acc: guojmev
    guojmme+N+Sg+Ill: guojmmáj
    guojmme+N+Sg+Ela: guojmes
    guojmme+N+Sg+Com: guojmijn
    guojmme+N+Pl+Acc: guojmijt
    guojmme+N+Pl+Ill: guojmijda
    guojmme+N+Pl+Ela: guojmijs
    guojmme+N+Pl+Com: guojmij
    guojmme+N+Ess: guojmmen

  Noun - irgge: # NOADE
    irgge+N+Sg+Nom: irgge
    irgge+N+Sg+Acc: irggev
    irgge+N+Sg+Ill: irggáj
    irgge+N+Sg+Ela: irgges
    irgge+N+Sg+Com: irggijn
    irgge+N+Pl+Acc: irggijt
    irgge+N+Pl+Ill: irggijda
    irgge+N+Pl+Ela: irggijs
    irgge+N+Pl+Com: irggij
    irgge+N+Ess: irggen
    irgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: irggásj
    irgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: irggátjasj
    irgge+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: irggedibme
    irgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    irgge+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: irggálasj
    irgge+N+Abe: [irggedak, irggeda] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
    irgge+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: irgges
    irgge+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: irggásimme
    irgge+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: irggijis
    irgge+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: irggijimme
    
  Noun - muohtá: # NOADE
    muohtá+N+Sg+Nom: muohtá
    muohtá+N+Sg+Ine: muohtán
    muohtá+N+Sg+Ill: muohtáj
    muohtá+N+Pl+Ine: muohtájn
    muohtá+N+Pl+Com: muohtáj
    muohtá+N+Pl+Ill: muohtájda
    muohtá+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: muohtás
    muohtá+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: muohtásimme
